Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Enactment of Vermont Statutes Annotated

§ 51.
Vermont Statutes Annotated defined.

Vermont Statutes Annotated, Revision of 1959, as published by the Commission to revise the statutory law of Vermont under No. 91 of the Acts of 1957,

1 V.S.A. §§ 1-9

, are hereby enacted as positive statute law, exclusive of the prefatory subject matter, analyses, catchlines, notes, annotations, appendixes, tables and indexes contained therein.
They may be cited as —— V.S.A. § —— and they shall not, in any citation of the statutes, be considered as acts of the present year.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 262

, § 1, eff. June 11, 1959.

§ 52.
Vermont Statutes Annotated; time of taking effect.

Vermont Statutes Annotated shall take effect from and after July 1, 1959 except the parts thereof as to which a different provision is expressly made therein.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 262

, § 2, eff. June 11, 1959.

§§ 53,
54.
Repealed. 2013, No. 34, § 31.

§ 55.
Repeal of Vermont Statutes, Revision of 1947, and session laws not to affect associations and corporations.

The repeal of the Vermont Statutes, Revision of 1947, and acts of the General Assembly shall not affect associations or private corporations organized thereunder, but they may have and exercise the powers conferred thereby.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 262

, § 5, eff. June 11, 1959.

§ 56.
Limitations, how affected.

When a limitation or period of time prescribed in an act repealed, for acquiring a right, or barring a remedy, or for any other purpose, has begun to run and the same or a similar limitation is prescribed in the Vermont Statutes Annotated, the time of limitation shall continue to run, and shall have like effect as if the whole period had begun and ended under the operation of the Vermont Statutes Annotated.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 262

, § 6, eff. June 11, 1959.

§ 57.
Vermont Statutes Annotated, continuation of existing laws.

The provisions of the Vermont Statutes Annotated, so far as they are the same as those of existing laws, shall be construed as a continuation of those laws, and not as new enactments.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 262

, § 7, eff. June 11, 1959.

§ 58.
Repealed. 2013, No. 34, § 31.

§ 59.
Certified copy of Vermont Statutes Annotated.

A copy of the Vermont Statutes Annotated shall be kept in the office of the Secretary of State, to which copy that officer shall affix a certificate, under his or her hand and the Seal of the State, that the laws therein contained are the statute laws of the State of Vermont; and that certified copy shall be an authentic record of those laws.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 262

, § 9, eff. June 11, 1959.

§ 60.
Repealed. 2001, No. 30, § 3, eff. December 1, 2001.